Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 525.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of abuse of a corpse when, except as authorized by law, he or
she:
(a) Intentionally treats a corpse in a way that would outrage ordinary family
sensibilities;
(b) [. A person shall also be guilty of abuse of a corpse if that person ]Enters into
a contract and accepts remuneration for the preparation of a corpse for burial
or the burial or cremation of a corpse and then deliberately fails to prepare,
bury, or cremate that corpse in accordance with that contract; or
(c) Knowingly purchases, sells, transfers, or offers to purchase, sell, or transfer
a corpse or any part of a corpse for remuneration or other consideration
after the corpse has been authorized for final disposition through cremation
or burial.
(2) Abuse of a corpse is a Class D felony.
Page 1 of 1
BR039600.100 - 396 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed